MLFT4 Stock Price & News - Jereissati Participacoes S/A Pref - Barron'sAsiaU.S.SubscribeSubscribeLog InSee All CompaniesSearchJereissati Participacoes S/A PrefMLFT4Brazil: BovespaAdd to WatchlistQuoteQuoteCompany & PeopleFinancialsResearch & RatingsAdvanced ChartMarket OpenR$15.00-0.19  (-1.251%)Aug 3, 2017 11:33 a.m. ET BRSTComprehensive quote14.64%Current Vol65 Day Avg4.3K29.4KPrevious CloseR$15.19OpenR$15.18Day RangeR$15.00 - R$15.1952 Wk RangeR$5.80 - R$15.19Market ValueR$1.6BYtd net Change103%1 Yr net Change150%P/E Ratio(TTM)36.69EPS(TTM)R$0.41Div & YieldN/A (N/A)Beta0.23 Compare Day Low 15.0015.19 Day HighCurrent 15.00Open 15.18NewsBarron'sSourceBarron'sOther Dow JonesPress ReleasesBarron'sOther Dow JonesPress ReleasesNo news for MLFT4Apr 25, 2008Brazil's Oi Signs Deal To Buy Rival Brasil TelecomDow Jones NewswiresApr 25, 2008Brazil's Oi Sees Brasil Telecom Takeover Deal Signed FridayDow Jones NewswiresMar 28, 2008Brazil's Oi Close To Brasil Telecom Takeover DealDow Jones NewswiresFeb 7, 2008Brazil Oi Says Talks Progress On Brasil Telecom BuyDow Jones NewswiresJan 9, 2008Brazil Oi Hldrs To Study Restructuring, AcquisitionsDow Jones NewswiresOct 11, 2007Brazil Telecom Oi Buyout Offer Fails At 51% TenderedDow Jones NewswiresSep 24, 2007Brazil Telemar Gets BNDES Funding Promise For Bridge LoanDow Jones NewswiresAug 2, 2007Brazil Telco Oi Raises Share Buyback OfferDow Jones NewswiresAug 2, 2007Brazil's Oi Increases Price For Share BuybackDow Jones NewswiresNo press releases for MLFT4Major HoldersMutual FundsInstitutionalDirect HoldersNameShares Held% OutstandingChange in Shares% of AssetsAs Of DateMCR/Principal Fundo de Investimento em Ações1.57M2.87%679.7K31.29%03/31/1711.3K0.02%11.3K0.18%04/30/17NameShares Held% OutstandingChange in Shares% of AssetsAs Of DateCaixa de Previdência dos Funcionários do Banco do Brasil12.69M23.15%00.78%05/9/17SPX Gestão de Recursos Ltda.4.44M8.1%396.37K35.41%05/9/17Principal Gestão de Investimentos Ltda.1.57M2.87%679.7K45.96%03/31/17Segall Bryant & Hamill LLC11.3K0.02%11.3K0%04/30/17NameShares HeldAs Of DateCarlos Francisco Ribeiro Jereissati26.34M06/22/17Jereissati Participações SA624.09K05/13/16Denmarsudamericanishe Group332.58K05/31/16Kalila Representaes Comerciais Ltda.181.78K05/9/17Legey Diana Jereissati97.95K05/9/17Jereissati Vera Ribeiro96.97K05/9/17Jereissati Lia Ribeiro96.1K05/9/17Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source: FactSet FundamentalsFeedback on our new quotes?EMAIL USKey Stock DataShares Outstanding54.79MLatest DividendR$0.45Ex-Dividend DateJul 17, 2017Institutional Ownership34.15%See Company FinancialsSee Company RatingsProfileJereissati Participações SA is a holding company, which invests in companies providing advisory services; and economic, financial...See Company OverviewKey ExecutivesCarlos Francisco Ribeiro JereissatiChairmanCarlos JereissatiChief Executive Officer & DirectorErika Jereissati ZulloDirector-Product Mix & RetailSidnei NunesManaging DirectorArlindo Magno de OliveiraDirectorCompetitors (MLFT4)Symbol% ChgMarket CapIDNT31.3%R$163.4MGSHP30.204%R$371.6MCIEL3-3.032%R$67.2BOIBR40.599%R$3.3BMore information on MLFT4Competitor Data Provided By:capital cubeNOTES & DATA PROVIDERS NOTES & DATA PROVIDERS×Real-time U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only.International stock quotes are delayed as per exchange requirements. Indexes may be real-time or delayed; refer to time stamps on index quote pages for information on delay times.Quote data, except U.S. stocks, provided by SIX Financial Information.Data is provided "as is" for informational purposes only and is not intended for trading purposes. SIX Financial Information (a) does not make any express or implied warranties of any kind regarding the data, including, without limitation, any warranty of merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose or use; and (b) shall not be liable for any errors, incompleteness, interruption or delay, action taken in reliance on any data, or for any damages resulting therefrom. Data may be intentionally delayed pursuant to supplier requirements.All of the mutual fund and ETF information contained in this display was supplied by Lipper, A Thomson Reuters Company, subject to the following: Copyright 2017 © Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Any copying, republication or redistribution of Lipper content, including by caching, framing or similar means, is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Lipper. Lipper shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon. Bond quotes are updated in real-time. Source: Tullett Prebon. Currency quotes are updated in real-time. Source: Tullet Prebon.Fundamental company data and analyst estimates provided by FactSet. Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved.




















 



 Oi- Approval by Telemar Participacoes Shareholders of the Planned Measures for the Transaction 
         










    










 






 











 









Oi- Approval by Telemar Participacoes Shareholders of the Planned Measures for the Transaction Goals Published on February 20, 2014

		  Completion of the Exchange of Oi Shares for Securities of Rio Forte
		

Apr 01, 2015, 01:03 ET
		  		  					
						 from   Oi S.A. 











 
















































 

 




















 


RIO DE JANEIRO, April 1, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Oi S.A. ("Oi" - Bovespa: OIBR3, OIBR4; NYSE:   OIBR and OIBR.C), pursuant to art. 157, paragraph 4, of Law No. 6,404/76 and Instruction No. 358/02 of the Brazilian Securities and Exchange Commission (Comissao de Valores Mobiliarios – CVM), and in furtherance with the Material Fact published on March 26, 2015, informs its shareholders and the market in general, that on this date, Telemar Participacoes S.A. ("TmarPart") disclosed the following Material Fact.
"Telemar Participacoes S.A. ("TmarPart"), pursuant to art. 157, paragraph 4, of Law No. 6,404/76 and Instruction No. 358/02 of the Brazilian Securities and Exchange Commission (Comissao de Valores Mobiliarios – CVM), and in furtherance of the Material Fact published on March 26, 2015, informs that, in the shareholders' meeting scheduled for March 31, 2015, in accordance with the terms of TmarPart's Shareholders' Agreement, the management of TmarPart and Oi, respectively, received the approval to begin taking the applicable steps to adopt a set of measures to meet the main goals of the planned business combination of Oi, TmarPart, and Portugal Telecom, SGPS, S.A. ("PT SGPS"), as published on February 20, 2014, (the "Transaction"), according to the terms below.
The shareholders of TmarPart unanimously approved the adoption of an alternative share structure, after analyzing options and taking into consideration the current obstacles to a registration of TmarPart shares with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") that would be necessary to allow the incorporacao de acoes ("Merger of Shares") of Oi and TmarPart, as described in the Material Fact of March 26, 2015. The adopted alternative share structure allows the main goals of the Transaction to be met, with Oi able to adopt the corporate governance best practices prescribed by the regulations of the Novo Mercado segment of the BM&F Bovespa S.A. – Bolsa de Valores, Mercadorias e Futuros ("BM&F Bovespa") and disperse its voting rights, keeping in mind the final objective of opportunely completing the Transaction with the result of listing the shares currently held by Oi shareholders, and, at a later point, those of the shares held by PT SGPS, on the Novo Mercado.
1. Measures Approved by the Shareholders of TmarPart to Meet the Goals of the Transaction
The alternative share structure includes a voluntary exchange of Oi's preferred shares for common shares (in other words, at the option of the preferred shareholder), at an exchange rate of 0.9211 common shares for each preferred share issued by Oi, as already published for the Merger of Shares between Oi and TmarPart, and used for the pricing of the public offering of shares by Oi on April 28, 2014. 
The voluntary exchange proposal requires that at least two-thirds of Oi's preferred shareholders (ex-treasury) agree to exchange their shares for common shares (the "Condition for the Exchange"), within a period of 30 days, commencing after the General Shareholders' Meeting of Oi at which the opening of the period for the exchange is deliberated (the "Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares").
As preliminary steps for the beginning of the period for the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares, the following steps, which are closely related to one another, need to be approved and implemented simultaneously, concurrently and inseparable one from the other (the "Preliminary Steps"):

(i)  Merger of the entities that directly or indirectly own shares of Oi ("Simplification of Corporate Ownership");
(ii)  Approval of the new by laws of Oi, reflecting the improved standards of Oi's corporate governance;
(iii)  Election of Oi's new Board of Directors, with a term expiring at the General Shareholders' Meeting that approves Oi's financial statements for the year ending on December 31, 2017.

2. Main Steps of the Simplification of Corporate Ownership
The following corporate restructuring transactions will be completed with the goal of simplifying the share capital structure of Oi, and are to be deliberated during the shareholders' general meetings, to be held on the same date, and before the start of the period for the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares: (i) merger of AG Telecom Participacoes S.A. ("AG Tel") into Pasa Participacoes S.A. ("PASA"), LF Tel S.A. ("LF") into EDSP75 Participacoes S.A. ("EDSP75"), and PASA and EDSP75 into Bratel Brasil S.A. ("Bratel"); (ii) merger of Valverde Participacoes S.A. into TmarPart; (iii) merger of Venus RJ Participacoes S.A. ("Venus"), Sayed RJ Participacoes S.A. ("Sayed") and PTB2 into Bratel; (iv) merger of Bratel into TmarPart; and finally (v) the merger of TmarPart into Oi.
As previously disclosed in the Material Fact, dated February 20, 2014, the Simplification of Corporate Ownership will be done without diluting the interests of the other shareholders that hold interests in the companies involved, given that the established exchange ratios solely take into account the direct and indirect interests between them and in Oi's share capital, observing the premise that these companies will not have, with the possible exception of goodwill recorded in relation to their investments, relevant assets or liabilities (or they will have sufficient cash and cash equivalents to fully repay such liabilities). Any goodwill, or other assets, recorded by the companies whose structure will be simplified may be transferred to Oi or to TmarPart, as the case may be, for the benefit of their shareholders, and these amounts will not be considered when establishing exchange ratios.
The TmarPart Shareholders' Agreements will terminate as a consequence of the Simplification of Corporate Ownership
3. Proposal for New Oi Bylaws
The shareholders of TmarPart approved the proposal for new by-laws of Oi that will be submitted to the Board of Directors and the General Meeting of Oi's shareholders, which will allow Oi to adopt improved levels of corporate governance, as well as to disperse the right to vote, in accordance with governance pledges made with to market.
Oi's new bylaws will include, among other things, the following main provisions:

(i)  A 100% tag along for common shares;
(ii)  Preferred shares without the right to vote, but would maintain the rights currently held by the preferred shareholders;
(iii)  Convertibility of the preferred shares, during the time periods and in accordance with the conditions approved by the Board of Directors;
(iv)  The voting rights of a single shareholder cannot exceed 15%;
(v)  As stipulated by the Regulations of the Novo Mercado, at least 20% of the Directors must be independent;
(vi)  A collective term of two years for the members of the Board of Directors, with exception to the first Board of Directors, which shall have a term of three years;
(vii)  Prohibition against the same person holding the positions of Chairman of the Board of Directors and Chief Executive Officer (except during the first three years from adoption of the new Bylaws);
(viii)  The Board of Directors is obligated to address any public offer to repurchase Oi's shares;
(ix)  The requirement to complete an offer to purchase common shares at a price at least equal to the economic value of the shares in the case of termination of the registration or exit from Level 1 Corporate Governance of the BM&F Bovespa, except in the event that Oi enters the Level 2 Corporate Governance or the Novo Mercado segment of the BM&F Bovespa;
(x)  Mandatory resolution of disputes or controversies through arbitration in front of the Market Arbitration Chamber (Camara de Arbitragem do Mercado).

The limitation on voting rights will cease to be in effect in the following events:

(i)  capital increase or corporate reorganization that results in a dilution of the current shareholder base of more than 50%;
(ii)  as a result of an offer to purchase all outstanding common shares of Oi in which the offeror acquires at least 20% of the outstanding common shares or such offeror or group of shareholders representing the same or related interest of the offeror by voting agreement comes to hold, either individually or together, an interest in excess of 50% of Oi's voting capital; or
(iii)  at any time, no shareholder of Oi or group of shareholders representing the same or related interest by voting agreement, holds, individually or together, an interest in excess of 15% of Oi's voting capital.

4. Commitment to Convert Shares Assumed by the Shareholders of TmarPart
The shareholders of TmarPart that hold shares of Oi, have committed to convert their preferred shares in Oi to common shares pursuant to the approved exchange ratio of 0.9211 common shares for each preferred share issued by Oi. This commitment will remain in effect until the earlier of October 31, 2015 and the end of the 30-day term for the completion of the conversion of Oi's preferred shares into common shares under the structure for the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares, subject to implementation of the Condition for the Exchange.
5. Commitment to Merge the Shareholder Bases of Oi and PT SGPS
In addition, TmarPart, Oi and PT SGPS executed on the date hereof an amendment to the Terms of Commitment Agreement, dated September 8, 2014, which requires the parties to use their best efforts and take all reasonable steps to cause the listing of Oi's shares (or securities backed by the shares of Oi or its successor in the event of a corporate reorganization) on the NYSE Euronext Lisbon (a regulated market), in addition to the New York Stock Exchange and BM&FBovespa, where the shares of Oi are already listed.
6. Amendment to the Option Agreement with PT SGPS
In addition, Oi also adjusted an amendment to the Option Agreement with PT SGPS, in order to allow PT SGPS to assign its call option to purchase Oi's shares.  In consideration for the foregoing, Oi will have a right of first refusal exercisable prior to such assignment. The effectiveness of the amendment to the Option Agreement is subject to the approval at Oi's General Shareholders' Meeting at which holders of preferred shares will be entitled to vote and approval by the CVM, if applicable. Oi's General Shareholders' Meeting to deliberate on the amendment to the Option Agreement will be called on or prior to August 31, 2015 and held on or prior September 30, 2015.
The General Shareholders' Meeting of Oi to approve the amendment to the Option Agreement will take place within the above time frame, and if possible, during the same General Shareholders' Meeting at which the Preliminary Steps will be approved, unless the decision of the CVM is still pending with respect to the amendment to the Option Agreement.  Certain shareholders of TmarPart have agreed to vote their shares in favor of the above amendment during Oi's General Shareholders' Meeting that will vote on the amendment to the Option Agreement.
7. Conditions for Implementation, Approvals and other Information
Within the next few days, Oi and TmarPart's management, as the case may be, will initiate the appropriate actions, including the preparation of all corporate acts and relevant contracts, for the adoption of the matters described in this Material Fact to be submitted for approval in new Preliminary Meetings of shareholders to be called in due course.
In addition to the relevant corporate approvals, the transactions and matters described in this Material Fact are subject to prior approval of the National Telecommunications Agency (Agencia Nacional de Telecomunicacoes, or "ANATEL").
The Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares and the Preliminary Steps will also be submitted for consent to certain creditors and debenture holders, pursuant to their respective debt instruments, but are not, however, subject to their approval.
The other conditions of the transactions described in this Material Fact, notably the full terms of the merger of TmarPart into Oi, in the form required by CVM Instruction No. 319/99, will be disclosed in the form of a Material Fact after the approval of the transactions by the management of Oi and TmarPart.
8. Expected Timeline
It is estimated that the general meetings which will deliberate regarding the Preliminary Steps, as well as the opening date for the shareholders of Oi's preferred shares to express their intent to convert their preferred shares into common shares, will be called in approximately 130 days, subject to ANATEL's prior consent to the implementation of the transactions and matters described in this Material Fact."
The shareholders also set October 31, 2015 as the deadline for the implementation of the Preliminary Steps.
*          *          *
Consummation of the Exchange
Oi reports that, following the approval by its General Shareholders' Meeting held on March 26, 2015, the exchange contracted for on September 8, 2014 by Oi, TmarPart, PT SGPS, Portugal Telecom International Finance B.V. ("PT Finance") and PT Portugal, SGPS, S.A. ("PT Portugal") was consummated, under which PT SGPS transferred 47,434,872 Oi common shares and 94,869,744 Oi preferred shares to PT Finance; and Oi, through PT Finance, in turn, transferred to PT SGPS securities issued by Rio Forte Investments, S.A. in the aggregate principal amount of €897 million, without remainder (the "Exchange").
As a result of the consummation of the Exchange, PT SGPS's direct interest in Oi declined from 104,580,393 common shares and 172,025,273 preferred shares, representing 37.66% of the voting capital (ex-treasury) and 32.82% of the total share capital of Oi (ex-treasury), to 57,145,521 common shares and 77,155,529 preferred shares, representing 24.81% of the voting capital (ex-treasury) and 19.17% of the total share capital of Oi (ex-treasury). Oi's shares received by PT Finance as a result of the Exchange remain in treasury. 
Pursuant to the terms of the Option Agreement entered into on September 8, 2014 between PT SGPS, PT Finance, PT Portugal, Oi and TmarPart, and amended on the date hereof, the call option to acquire Oi's shares granted to PT SGPS becomes exercisable from the date hereof for a period of six years, according to the terms and conditions already disclosed to the market. 
*          *          *
Oi will maintain its shareholders and the market informed of any developments of relevant events related to the matters described in this Material Fact.
Rio de Janeiro, March 31, 2015.
Oi S.A.
Bayard De Paoli Gontijo
Chief Executive and Financial Officer and Investor Relations Officer
Additional Information and Where to Find It: 
This Material Fact is for informational purposes only and is not an offer to purchase or a solicitation of an offer to sell any shares of Oi. The proposed Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares described in this Material Fact has not commenced. 
Any offer to purchase or the solicitation of an offer to sell preferred shares of Oi will be made only pursuant to an offer to purchase and related materials that Oi intends to file with the SEC upon commencement of this offer. Oi urges shareholders who are eligible to participate in the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares to carefully read the offer to purchase and related materials relating to the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares when they become available and prior to making any decisions with respect to the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares as these documents will contain important information about the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares. 
Following the filing with the Commission of (1) the offer to purchase and related materials relating to the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares, or (2) any other offer materials related to the Voluntary Exchange of Preferred Shares, shareholders of Oi will be able to obtain the filed documents free of charge on the SEC's website at www.sec.gov or from Oi. 
Special Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements: 
This Material Fact contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the U.S. Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 and Brazilian applicable regulation. Statements that are not historical facts, including statements regarding the beliefs and expectations of Oi and TmarPart, business strategies, future synergies and cost savings, future costs and future liquidity are forward-looking statements. The words "will," "may," "should," "could," "anticipates," "intends," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "forecasts", "plans," "targets," "goal" and similar expressions, as they relate to Oi, TmarPart or their respective management, are intended to identify forward-looking statements. There is no guarantee that the expected events, tendencies or expected results will actually occur. Such statements reflect the current views of Oi's or TmarPart's management and are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties. These statements are based on many assumptions and factors, including general economic and market conditions, industry conditions, corporate approvals, operational factors and other factors. Any changes in such assumptions or factors could cause actual results to differ materially from current expectations. All forward-looking statements attributable to Oi, TmarPart or their respective affiliates, or persons acting on their behalf, are expressly qualified in their entirety by the cautionary statements set forth in this paragraph. Undue reliance should not be placed on such statements. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made. Except as required under the Brazilian and U.S. federal securities laws and the rules and regulations of the CVM, the SEC or of regulatory authorities in other applicable jurisdictions, Oi, TmarPart and their respective affiliates do not have any intention or obligation to update or to publicly announce the results of any revisions to any of the forward-looking statements to reflect actual results, future events or developments, changes in assumptions or changes in other factors affecting the forward-looking statements. You are advised, however, to consult any further disclosures Oi or TmarPart makes on related subjects in reports and communications that Oi and TmarPart file with the SEC.
 SOURCE  Oi S.A.  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Apr 22, 2015, 09:13 ET
Preview: Approval of the European Commission of the Acquisition by Altice Portugal, S.A. of all PT Portugal, SGPS, S.A. Shares Held by Oi S.A.













Mar 30, 2015, 09:28 ET
Preview: Oi S.A.: Ordinary General Shareholders' Meeting - Call Notice






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 




















 



 Oi S.A. - MATERIAL FACT: Consolidation of the Activities and Businesses of Oi and Portugal Telecom 
         










   










 






 











 









Oi S.A. - MATERIAL FACT: Consolidation of the Activities and Businesses of Oi and Portugal Telecom

Feb 20, 2014, 04:03 ET
		  		  					
						 from   Oi S.A. 











 
















































 

 




















 


RIO DE JANEIRO, Feb. 20, 2014 /PRNewswire/ -- Oi S.A. ("Oi" or the "Company", Bovespa: OIBR3, OIBR4; NYSE:   OIBR and OIBR.C) and Telemar Participacoes S.A. ("CorpCo"), in accordance with article 157, paragraph 4 of Law No. 6,404/76 (the "Brazilian Corporations Law") and CVM Instruction No. 358/02, notifies their shareholders and the market in general of the previously informed transaction of the combination, in one entity, of the activities and business operations of Oi in Brazil and Portugal Telecom, SGPS, S.A. ("Portugal Telecom") in Portugal and Africa, consolidating the industrial alliance between Oi and Portugal Telecom, initiated in 2010 and developed since that time, and combining the shareholder bases of Oi, Portugal Telecom and CorpCo (the "Transaction").
On February 19, 2014, several definitive agreements have been entered into ("Definitive Documents") that describe the necessary phases for completing the Transaction.  Such documents provide that Telemar Participacoes S.A. will be the entity that, after all phases of the Transaction have been approved, will consolidate the shareholder bases of the companies involved in the Transaction.
The following assumptions guide the Transaction:
(i)     the formation of a single large multinational company based in Brazil; 
(ii)     the continuity of operations under the trademarks of Oi and Portugal Telecom in their respective regions of operation, subject to unified control and management by CorpCo; 
(iii)     the consolidation of the Industrial Alliance, enabling the maximization of synergies, reduction of operational risks, optimization of efficient investments and ensuring best practices; 
(iv)     the strengthening of the capital structure of the integrated companies, facilitating their access to capital and financial resources; 
(v)     the consolidation of the shareholder bases of CorpCo, Oi and Portugal Telecom solely in common shares traded on the Novo Mercado segment of the BM&FBOVESPA, the NYSE Euronext Lisbon and the NYSE; 
(vi)     the diffusion of CorpCo 's shareholder base, which, after the implementation of the Transactions, will have no shareholder or group of shareholders holding a majority of the capital;
(vii)     the adoption of best corporate governance practices of the "Novo Mercado" segment of the BM&FBOVESPA; and
(viii)     the promotion of greater liquidity of the shares traded in these markets.
Creation of a telecommunications multinational leader
The combination of Oi and Portugal Telecom will create a multinational telecom operator with operations covering a total population of 260 million people and more than 100 million clients. The combination of the groups will aim to achieve significant economies of scale, maximize operational synergies and add value for their shareholders, customers and employees.
Commitment to highest corporate governance standards
The Transaction will be executed in order to consolidate the industrial alliance established in 2010 between Oi and Portugal Telecom. As part of the Transaction, CorpCo will apply to be listed on the "Novo Mercado" segment of the BM&FBOVESPA and will implement of the highest corporate governance practices with one type and class of shares, with equal voting and dividend rights for all shareholders.
Unified management team led by Zeinal Bava
Zeinal Bava, CEO of Portugal Telecom from 2008 to 2013 and the current CEO of PT Portugal as well as CEO of Oi, will head CorpCo and its subsidiaries as its CEO.
Agility in taking advantages of growth opportunities in Brazil
The Transaction will allow CorpCo to leverage Oi's unique footprint in Brazil and Portugal Telecom's experience in the Portuguese market, thus allowing it to crystalize the growth opportunities in convergence and mobility in Brazil.
Commitment to financial discipline and value creation
CorpCo will place a strong focus on excellence in integration and operational practices. A clear plan for action has been identified to integrate areas of potential efficiency. This includes identified teams in place to capture synergies and address existing operational challenges.
After the last stage of the Transaction, it may generate operational and financial synergies estimated to have a net present value of approximately R$5.5 billion.
CorpCo is committed to its financial discipline to improve the flexibility of its balance sheet in order to reduce financial risk and to allow future investments in growth areas.
Stages of the Transaction
The approved Transaction will consist of the following stages:
1.     Transfer of shares held by AG and LF
Initially, there will be transfers by Andrade Gutierrez S.A. ("AG") of shares of PASA Participacoes S.A. ("PASA") that it holds to Venus RJ Participacoes S.A. ("Venus"), and by Jereissati Telecom S.A. ("Jereissati Telecom") of shares of EDSP75 Participacoes S.A. ("EDSP75") that it holds to Sayed RJ Participacoes S.A. ("Sayed").  As a result, AG, Bratel Brasil S.A., a subsidiary of Portugal Telecom ("Bratel Brasil") and Venus will be PASA's shareholders and Jereissati Telecom, Bratel Brasil and Sayed will be EDSP75's shareholders.  The corporate structure chart below sets for the configuration of these companies after these share transfers occur.
2.     Issuance of Convertible Debentures
Venus, PASA, AG Telecom Participacoes S.A. ("AG Telecom"), Jereissati Telecom, EDSP75, LF Tel S.A. ("LF") and CorpCo will each issue debentures convertible into common and/or preferred shares, as the case may be, in order to provide the cash proceeds necessary to equalize the indebtedness between these companies and/or their subsidiaries.  Venus and Sayed will each issue debentures convertible into shares that will be subscribed to and paid for by PTB2 S.A. ("PTB2"), a subsidiary of Portugal Telecom, in the amount of R$938.5 million each.  Following this, PASA and EDSP75 will each issue debentures convertible into shares that will be subscribed to and paid for by Bratel Brasil, Venus and Sayed in the amount of R$2,394 million. Immediately thereafter, LF and AG Telecom will each issue debentures convertible into shares that will be subscribed to and paid for by EDSP75 and PASA in the amount of R$2,394 million.  Finally, CorpCo will issue debentures convertible into shares that will be subscribed to and paid for by LF and AG Telecom in the amount of R$3,428 million.
3.     Oi's Capital Increase
On February 19, 2014, the Company's Board of Directors has approved the request to register with the Brazilian securities regulator (Comissao de Valores Mobilarios, the "CVM") an initial public offering of the Company's common and preferred shares, including shares in the form of American Depositary Shares, represented by American Depositary Receipts, to be simultaneously carried out in Brasil and abroad ("Public Offering" and "Oi's Capital Increase", respectively).  The protocol for this registration with the CVM was also completed on February 19, 2014.
Oi's Capital Increase will be within its authorized capital limit, in conformity with the proposed bylaw amendment to be decided on at the Company's extraordinary general shareholders' meeting scheduled to occur on March 27, 2014.  Oi's Capital Increase will not confer the right of first refusal to its current shareholders; however, Oi's current shareholders will have priority with respect to the priority offering.
Portugal Telecom has undertaken to subscribe to a portion of Oi's Capital Increase to be paid in with assets, in order to contribute to Oi, with respect to the priority offer, shares in the companies that hold the entirety of (i) Portugal Telecom's operational assets, except direct and indirect interests held in Oi, Contax Participacoes S.A. and Bratel, BV and (ii) Portugal Telecom's liabilities as of the date of contribution considered in the valuation report (the "PT Assets"). Portugal Telecom's undertaking to subscribe to a portion of Oi's Capital Increase is subject to conditions precedent, including approval by Portugal Telecom's general shareholders' meeting and subscription in cash for no less than R$7,000,000,000 (seven billion reais) in Oi's Capital Increase.  
The PT Assets were independently valued by Banco Santander (Brasil) S.A. and the respective valuation report ("Valuation Report"), which will also be submitted to the Company's shareholders for approval at the Company's extraordinary general shareholders' meeting scheduled to occur on March 27, 2014, will be available on the Company's investor relations website and the IPE system of the CVM (both referenced at the end of this Material Fact) on February 21, 2014, the date on which the call notice to the referred to general shareholders' meeting will be published.  According Santander's valuation report, the PT Assets were valued at an amount between €1,636.3 million and €1,808.5 million; such amounts will be converted into Brazilian reais on February 21, 2014.  At this extraordinary general shareholders' meeting and in accordance with the Brazilian Corporations Law, Portugal Telecom and its subsidiary Bratel Brasil will not cast votes on matters concerning the valuation report of the PT Assets.  The valuation of the PT Assets, for purposes of the payment for shares issued by Oi in Oi's Capital Increase, has been established as €1,750.0 million, which is within the range indicated by the Valuation Report and meets the amount of €1,900 million required by the Memorandum of Understanding entered into on October 1, 2013, taking into account the dividend to be paid by Portugal Telecom before the conclusion of this Transaction and other costs related to it as set forth in the Memorandum of Understanding.  These amounts were already taken into consideration in the Valuation Report.
An investment vehicle managed by Banco BTG Pactual S.A. ("FIA" and "BTG Pactual") has undertaken to subscribe to common and/or preferred shares issued by Oi in an amount equivalent to the difference between R$2.0 billion and value corresponding to the subscription orders that are placed in the offering by CorpCo's shareholders, excluding Bratel Brasil.  FIA's undertaking to subscribe to Oi's shares is subject to conditions precedent, including the necessary corporate approvals from the Company and Portugal Telecom.
The total value of the Oi Capital Increase is estimated to be approximately R$14.1 billion.
The Public Offering will be carried out by a firm commitment ("Firm Commitment") to be granted by the Underwriters to the Company and exercisable on the date of conclusion of the bookbuilding process at a subscription price per common share and/or preferred share to be proposed by the Underwriters to the Company on such date, taking into consideration market conditions and price per share posted during the bookbuilding and also as mutually agreed by the Underwriters and the Company in accordance with market standards normally accepted by CVM and the SEC in this type of transaction. No Firm Commitment will be granted with respect to (i) the portion of the Public Offering to be paid in with PT Assets by Portugal Telecom and (ii) the portion of the Public Offering equivalent to the investment intention in the approximate amount of R$2 billion to be made by Corpco's current shareholders and by an investment vehicle managed by BTG Pactual.
4.     Settlement of the Convertible Debentures and Separation of the CTX/Contax Assets
After settlement of the Oi Capital Increase, the convertible debentures issued by Venus, PASA, AG, Sayed, ESP75 and LF (the "Holdings Debenture") and the convertible debentures issued by CorpCo (the "CorpCo Debentures") will be paid for by Portugal Telecom and by the Holdings.  Then AG, LF, PASA and EDSP75 will engage in split-off transactions in order to separate the interests they directly and indirectly hold in CTX Participacoes S.A. ("CTX") and Contax Participacoes S.A. ("Contax") from interests directly and indirectly held in CorpCo and Oi.  After completing these split-offs, Bratel Brasil, on the one hand, and AG and Jereissati Telecom, on the other, will exchange shares they hold in PASA Contact Center Participacoes S.A. and Detmold RJ Participacoes S.A. (which will receive, respectively, the split-off assets of PASA and EDSP75) for shares issued by PASA and EDSP75, respectively.
As a result of the split-offs and share exchanges described above, Bratel Brasil, as well as AG, LF, PASA and EDSP75 will only hold direct and indirect interests in CorpCo and Oi.
5.     Conversion of Debenture Holdings
Soon after the slit-off and share exchanges, the Holdings Debentures will be converted into common and preferred shares in Venus, PASA, AG, Sayed, EDSP75 and LF.  The corporate structure chart below presents the configuration of such companies after the conversion of the Holdings Debentures:
6.     Conversion of the CorpCo Debentures and the Corporate Reorganization of the Intermediary Companies that Control CorpCo and Oi
On the date of the shareholders' meetings that will decide on the Intermediary Company Reorganization (as defined below) and the merger of shares of Oi and CorpCo (which are expected to occur approximately 60 days after the settlement of the Oi Capital Increase), the CorpCo Debentures will be converted into common shares issued by CorpCo, subject to the approval of such Intermediary Company Reorganization and the merger of shares of Oi and CorpCo, which will result in the following distribution of capital among its shareholders.
Immediately after the converting the Convertible Debentures, CorpCo's and Oi's controlling shareholders will carry out corporate reorganizations in order to simplify their organizational structure (the "Intermediary Company Reorganization").  The transactions that will be carried out within the scope of the Intermediary Company Reorganization will be done without diluting the interests of the other shareholders that hold interests in the companies involved, given that the established exchange ratios solely take into account the direct and indirect interests between them and in Oi's share capital, observing the premise that these companies will not have, with the possible exception of goodwill recorded in relation to their investments, relevant assets or liabilities (or they will have sufficient cash and cash equivalents to fully repay such liabilities).  Any goodwill, or other assets, recorded by the companies whose structure will be simplified may be transferred to Oi or to CorpCo, as the case may be, for the benefit of their shareholders, and these amounts will not be considered when establishing exchange ratios.
The Intermediary Company Reorganization is expected to include the following transactions, which will be approved on the same date and will occur in the order in which they are described below:
After the completion of the Intermediary Company Reorganization, CorpCo is expected to hold 126.6 million common shares and 96.2 million preferred shares issued by Oi.
The table below indicates the corporate structure of Oi's controlling shareholders before and after the Intermediary Company Reorganization:
7.      Merger of Oi's Shares into Corp Co
On the same day that the transactions comprising the Intermediary Company Reorganization are approved, general meetings of the shareholders of Oi and CorpCo will be held to deliberate on the merger of Oi's shares into CorpCo, in order for Oi to become a wholly-owned subsidiary of CorpCo (the "Merger of Oi's Shares").
As a result of the Merger of Oi's Shares, each common share issued by Oi will be replaced by one new common share issued by CorpCo and each preferred shares issued by Oi will be replaced by 0.9211new common share issued by CorpCo.
The exchange ratios were established based on the market quotations of Oi's shares during the 30-day period prior to the announcement of the material fact disclosing the Transaction, assuming that CorpCo will not have relevant assets or liabilities (or it will have sufficient cash and cash equivalents to fully repay its liabilities), and the capital of CorpCo will reflect the number of shares issued by Oi and held directly or indirectly by CorpCo immediately before the Merger of Oi's Shares.
In accordance with article 137, item II of the Brazilian Corporations Law, Oi's shareholders will not have withdrawal rights with respect to the Merger of Oi's Shares.
With respect to the decision to approve the Merger of Oi's Shares, CorpCo's dissenting shareholders will have the right to withdraw from the company, subject to the provisions of article 137 of the Brazilian Corporations Law, in exchange for the book value per share.  However, it is not expected that such shareholders will exercise their right of withdrawal.
8.     Merger of Portugal Telecom into CorpCo
The same shareholders' meeting that will deliberate on the Merger of Oi's Shares into CorpCo, will deliberate on the merger of Portugal Telecom into CorpCo, with CorpCo as the surviving entity (the "Portugal Telecom Merger").
At the time of the Portugal Telecom Merger, aside from shares issued by CorpCo, Portugal Telecom will not have any relevant assets or liabilities (or it will have sufficient cash and cash equivalents to fully repay its liabilities).  In the Portugal Telecom Merger, Portugal Telecom shareholders will receive an aggregate number of common shares issued by CorpCo equal to the number of common shares issued by CorpCo and held by Portugal Telecom immediately prior to the Portugal Telecom Merger.
CorpCo's inclusion in the Novo Mercado and Management 
In connection with the implementation of the actions required to carry out the Transaction, measures for the inclusion of CorpCo in the Novo Mercado listing segment of BM&FBovespa (the "Novo Mercado") will be taken, subject to the approval of the Merger of Oi's Shares.
Among these measures, a general meeting of CorpCo's shareholders will be held to decide on the reform of its Bylaws, in order to:
(i)     approve the selection of the company's new corporate name;
(ii)     conform to the rules of the Novo Mercado Listing Regulations, as well as to approve the listing of CorpCo's shares on the Novo Mercado; and
(iii)     approve the split of shares that will adjust the number of CorpCo's shares in a manner that immediately before the Merger of Oi's Shares the ratio between Oi's outstanding common shares and CorpCo's outstanding common shares will be 1:1.
At the same meeting of CorpCo's shareholders that decides on inclusion of CorpCo in the Novo Mercado, new members of its Board of Directors, Executive Board and the Fiscal Council will be elected, which will also be conditioned on approval of the Merger of Oi's Shares.  The elected members of CorpCo's Board of Directors will have a 3-year term of office from the date of their election or until the general shareholders' meeting deciding on the approval of CorpCo's financial statements the year ended December 31, 2016, whichever occurs first.
Other Information about the Transaction
The conclusion of the stages of the Transaction described above is subject to the implementation of some conditions, including its approval by the competent   corporate bodies of each entity involved in the Transaction, the obtainment of legal and regulatory authorizations, consent from creditors and third parties as well as the final and valid consummation of Oi's Capital Increase.
The public offering of shares connected with Oi's Capital Increase is subject to due registration with the CVM.  Considering that the shares of Oi and Portugal Telecom are registered with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"), the issuance of shares in connection with Oi's Capital Increase and the issuance of CorpCo's shares to the shareholders of Oi in connection with the Merger of Oi's Shares and to the shareholders of Portugal Telecom in connection with Portugal Telecom Merger will be subject to registration with the SEC under the U.S. Securities Act of 1933, and may be subject to registration in other jurisdictions.  This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval in any jurisdiction in which the disclosure of an offering document or such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or outside of the framework of securities law in such jurisdiction.
The information required by CVM Instruction No. 319/99, as applicable, will be disclosed in the form of a Material Fact when the call notices to the general shareholders' meetings of Oi and CorpCo that will decide on the mergers comprising the Transaction.
Also on February 19, 2014, amendments to the Shareholders' Agreements of AG, LF and CorpCo, executed or amended on January 25, 2011 were signed, establishing the commitment of the shareholders of CorpCo to exercise their voting rights in CorpCo, and also for their representatives on the Boards of Directors of Oi and CorpCo to exercise their rights to vote, in order to approve the Transaction.  In addition, Portugal Telecom, FIA, Bratel Brazil, CorpCo, AG and Jereissati entered into a Provisional Voting Commitment agreement, undertaking as shareholders of Oi to take all the required actions for the effective completion of the mergers of Bratel Brazil, Sayed, Venus and PTB2 into Oi and the merger of Oi's shares into CorpCo.
In addition, as part of the business combination of Oi and Portugal Telecom and conditioned on the PT Assets being contributed to Oi's capital, Oi has agreed to provide guarantees for certain indebtedness of Portugal Telecom and its subsidiaries that will be assumed by Oi at the time that it acquires the PT Assets.
The table below sets forth a timetable for the estimated dates on which certain stages of Oi's Capital Increase will be implemented.  Oi and CorpCo cannot guarantee that the events listed below will occur on their respective estimated dates:



Event


Estimated Date



First filing with the CVM


Feb. 19, 2014



General Meeting of Portugal Telecom's Shareholders to approve Portugal Telecom's participation in Oi's Capital Increase by contributing the PT Assets


March 27, 2014



General Meeting of Oi's shareholders to approve the valuation report of the PT Assets and increase the authorized capital stock of Oi


March 27, 2014



Pricing of Oi' Capital Increase


April 16, 2014



Closing of Oi' Capital Increase


April 23, 2014

Oi and CorpCo will keep their shareholders and the market in general informed of any subsequent material events related to the Transaction.
Rio de Janeiro, February 20, 2014.
OI S.A.
Bayard De Paoli Gontijo
Investor Relations Officer
Telemar Participacoes S.A.
Pedro Jereissati
Investor Relations Officer
Additional Information and Where to Find It: 
This communication is not an offering document and does not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy any securities or a solicitation of any vote or approval in any jurisdiction in which distribution of an offering document or such offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or qualification under the securities laws of that jurisdiction. 
This communication may contain information related to (1) the proposed capital increase and related public offering of common shares and preferred shares by Oi, (2) the proposed merger of shares (incorporacao de acoes) between TmarPart and Oi, and (3) the proposed merger (incorporacao) of Portugal Telecom with and into TmarPart. 
Oi may file a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") for the offering of its common shares and preferred shares to be issued in connection with its proposed capital increase. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents Oi has filed with the SEC for more complete information about Oi and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, Oi will arrange to send you the prospectus after filing if you request it by calling toll-free 1-855-672-2332. 
In connection with the proposed merger of shares between TmarPart and Oi and the proposed merger of Portugal Telecom with and into TmarPart, TmarPart or one of its affiliates plans to file with the SEC (1) one or more registration statements on Form F-4, containing a prospectus or prospectuses which will be mailed to shareholders of Oi and/or Portugal Telecom, as applicable (other than non-U.S. persons as defined in applicable rules of the SEC), and (2) other documents regarding this proposed merger. 
We urge investors and security holders to carefully read the relevant prospectuses and other relevant materials when they become available as they will contain important information about the proposed capital increase, proposed merger of shares and proposed merger.
Investors and security holders will be able to obtain the documents filed with the SEC regarding the proposed mergers, when available, free of charge on the Commission's website at www.sec.gov or from TmarPart or Oi. 
Special Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements: 
This communication contains certain forward-looking statements. Statements that are not historical facts, including statements about our beliefs and expectations, business strategies, future synergies and cost savings, future costs and future liquidity are forward-looking statements. The words "will," "may," "should," "could," "anticipates," "intends," "believes," "estimates," "expects," "plans," "targets," "goal" and similar expressions, as they relate to TmarPart, Oi or Portugal Telecom, are intended to identify forward-looking statements and are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties. There is no guarantee that the expected events, tendencies or expected results will actually occur. Such statements reflect the current views of management of Oi and are subject to a number of risks and uncertainties. These statements are based on many assumptions and factors, including general economic and market conditions, industry conditions, corporate approvals, operational factors and other factors. Any changes in such assumptions or factors could cause actual results to differ materially from current expectations. All forward-looking statements attributable to us, or persons acting on our behalf, are expressly qualified in their entirety by the cautionary statements set forth in this paragraph. Undue reliance should not be placed on such statements. Forward-looking statements speak only as of the date they are made. Except as required under the U.S. federal securities laws and the rules and regulations of the SEC or of regulatory authorities in other applicable jurisdictions, we do not have any intention or obligation to update or to publicly announce the results of any revisions to any of the forward-looking statements to reflect actual results, future events or developments, changes in assumptions or changes in other factors affecting the forward-looking statements. You are advised, however, to consult any further disclosures TmarPart, Oi or Portugal Telecom make on related subjects in reports and communications TmarPart, Oi or Portugal Telecom file with the SEC. 
 SOURCE  Oi S.A.  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.oi.net.br



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Feb 21, 2014, 08:31 ET
Preview: Oi S.A.: Call Notice - Extraordinary General Shareholders' Meeting













Feb 10, 2014, 05:45 ET
Preview: Oi S.A. - Material Fact - Clarifications Regarding Press Article






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 




LF Tel SA - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





LF Tel SA



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Recent Transactions Transaction Advisors



LF Tel SA



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


1997




Headquarters


Avineda Dr. Chucri Zaidan, 920, 16º Andar, São Paulo, Sao Paulo 04583-904




Industries


Other Business & Consulting Services




Company Description


LF Tel SA invests in companies related to the management and operation of telephone lines. It also provides economic, taxation, and financial consultancy services. The company was founded on November 20, 1997 and is headquartered in São Paulo, Brazil.






 In The News
          See more




PR Newswire
April 1, 2015





                        Oi- Approval by Telemar Participacoes Shareholders of the Planned Measures for the Transaction Goals Published on February 20, 2014: Completion of the Exchange of Oi Shares for Securities of Rio Forte                    





PR Newswire
February 20, 2014





                        Oi S.A. - MATERIAL FACT: Consolidation of the Activities and Businesses of Oi and Portugal Telecom                    





PR Newswire
October 25, 2013





                        Additional Information Regarding the Industrial Alliance between Oi and Portugal Telecom                    





PR Newswire
October 2, 2013





                        Portugal Telecom, SGPS, S.A. and Oi S.A. announce they have executed a Memorandum of Understanding for the merger of their activities                    






 Executives & Employees



Carlos Francisco Ribeiro Jereissati

Chairman




Sidnei Nunes

Chief Financial Officer & Director





Alexandre Jereissati Legey

Head-Investor Relations




Pedro Jereissati

Director-Vice President





Fernando Magalhães Portella

Vice President






See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Carlos Jereissati, Jr.




Pedro Jereissati

Director & Deputy Chief Executive Officer at Jereissati Participações SA





Sidnei Nunes




Aparecido Carlos Correia Galdino

Director-Investor Relations at Jereissati Participações SA







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to LF Tel SA



                        LF Tel SA                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 LF Tel SA






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with LF Tel SA.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    CTX Participações SA, BNDES Participações SA purchase Contax Participações SA from PHarol SGPS SA                                                                      




 Details Hidden



                                    CTX Participaçoes SA /Private Group purchases CTX Participações SA from BNDES Participações SA, Caixa de Previdência dos Funcionários do Banco do Brasil, Fundação Petrobras de Seguridade Social, Fundação dos Economiários Federais FUNCEF                                                                      





 Transaction Advisors



Companies ▾




Legal Advisor



Ulhôa Canto, Rezende e Guerra Advogados

                                        Advised on
                                        CTX Participaçoes SA /Private Group purchases CTX Participações SA from BNDES Participações SA, Caixa de Previdência dos Funcionários do Banco do Brasil, Fundação Petrobras de Seguridade Social, Fundação dos Economiários Federais FUNCEF                                      






You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤















Portugal Telecom (PT), Oi S.A. (OIBR) Enter Merger Agreement

















































Close (X)
	Set up related e-mail alerts – FREE!






Categories
Entities
Stocks
Sign up!



Hot Corp. News
Hot M&A
Management Comments
Mergers and Acquisitions


Dividend ($$)
Definitive Agreement ($$)





OIBR
PT





E-mail Address




















 













Log-In
|
Home
|
E-mail Alerts
|
My Headlines
|
Portfolio



Upgrade to StreetInsider Premium! - Free Trial








 




Home


Menu

JOIN
SI Premium
Ratings
M&A Insider
EPS Insider
Dividends
IPO Insider
Hedge Funds
Premium Letters
Submit Release


JOIN

SI Premium

Full Feed View
Headline View
SI Premium Squawk Box
Alerts
Custom Headlines 
UPGRADE TO SI PREMIUM
License



Calendars

Dividend Calendar
Earnings Calendar
Event Driven
FDA Calendar
Investor Conferences
IPO Calendar
Merger Arb
Ratings Calendar
Stock Split Calendar 



Ratings

Analyst Comments
Hot Analyst Comments
Analyst EPS Change
Analyst EPS View
Analyst PT Change
Credit Ratings
Downgrade News
Hot Downgrades
New Coverage News
Hot New Coverage
Upgrade News
Hot Upgrades
More...



M&A Insider

Merger News
Hot M&A News
Private Equity
Rumors
Spinoffs
Merger Arbitrage
Event Driven
2017 Top M&A Deals
Top 50 Takeover Targets
More...



EPS Insider

Earnings Calendar
Earnings News
Hot Earnings
Guidance
Hot Guidance
Conference Calls
Earnings History Search
More...



Dividends

Dividend Calendar
Dividend News
Hot Dividends
Dividend Hike
Special Dividends
Stock Buybacks
Hot Stock Buybacks
Stock Splits
More...



IPO Insider

IPO News
Hot IPOs
Equity Offerings
Recent IPOs
Upcoming IPOs
2017 Top IPOs
More...



Hedge Funds

13D
13F
13G
Hedge Funds News
Hot Insider Trades
Insider Trades
More...



Premium Letters

NEW *** Dividend Insider Elite
Pulse Picks
Ratings Insider Elite
Stealth Growth Insider


Submit Release





QUICK LINKS :
Goldman Sachs Conviction Buy List
Carl Icahn News
Warren Buffett News
Ackman News

Follow @Street_Insider









Management Comments, Hot M&A, Mergers and Acquisitions







Portugal Telecom (PT), Oi S.A. (OIBR) Enter Merger Agreement

Article
Related Articles (1)
Related SEC Filings (1)
Stock Quotes (2)
Comments (0)













FREE Breaking News Alerts from StreetInsider.com!


E-mail Address








StreetInsider.com Top Tickers, 8/3/2017

1. TSLA
2. TEVA
3. TTWO
4. SEDG
5. DATA


6. OCLR
7. SPY
8. SQ
9. WYN
10. ZNGA













Top News
Most Read
Special Reports



Wall Street opens flat as tech stocks slip
Tesla (TSLA) Tops Q2 EPS, Sales Beat
Oil rises as tighter U.S. market outweighs OPEC supply
UPDATE: Teva Pharma (TEVA) Misses Q2 EPS by 4c, Lowers FY EPS Guidance, Cuts Dividend
Exclusive: Goldman Sachs buys into Aramco $10 billion loan as it seeks IPO role - sources




TerraVia (TVIA) to Sell Substantially All of Its Assets and File Reorganization Under Chapter 11
After-Hours Stock Movers 08/02: (ESIO) (SEDG) (TSLA) Higher; (TTMI) (HIVE) (RGR) Lower (more...)
Wyndham Worldwide (WYN) to Split Into Two Publicly Traded Hospitality Companies
Symantec (SYMC) to Sell Website Security and Related PKI Solutions to DigiCert
Jacobs Engineering (JEC) to Acquire CH2M




Pre-Open Movers 08/03: (UBNT) (ESIO) (TSLA) Higher; (AGRX) (TEVA) (COMM) Lower (more...)
After-Hours Stock Movers 08/02: (ESIO) (SEDG) (TSLA) Higher; (TTMI) (HIVE) (RGR) Lower (more...)
Pre-Open Stock Movers 08/02: (PMC) (ILMN) (AAPL) Higher; (RSYS) (MTSI) (SSTK) Lower (more...)
After-Hours Stock Movers 08/01: (ILMN) (EYES) (AAPL) Higher; (RSYS) (MTSI) (COHR) Lower (more...)
Pre-Open Stock Movers 08/01: (CBMX) (LL) (SHOP) Higher; (SQNS) (SLCA) (UA) Lower (more...)










October 2, 2013 6:31 AM EDT

 Tweet
 Share
 E-mail
0 shares









Get Alerts PT Hot Sheet 

Price: $0.66 --0%
Overall Analyst Rating:
			              NEUTRAL (= Flat)


Trade PT Now!


Join SI Premium – FREE





PT and Oi announce a combination of their businesses

*  Portugal Telecom, SGPS, S.A. (NYSE: PT”), Oi S.A. (NYSE: OIBR), AG Telecom Participações S.A., LF Tel S.A., and their respective affiliates have today signed a memorandum of understanding (“MOU”) setting out the basis for a proposed merger of PT, Oi and the Oi Holding Companies (as defined below) into a single Brazilian incorporated listed entity.

*  The merger is a natural fulfilment of the industrial alliance established in 2010 creating a leading telecoms operator led by Zeinal Bava as CEO

*  As part of the merger, Oi proposes to undertake a cash capital increase of a minimum of R$ 7.0 billion (Euro 2.3 billion), and with a target of R$ 8.0 billion (Euro 2.7 billion) to improve the balance sheet flexibility of CorpCo. Shareholders of Telemar Participações S.A. (“Tpart”) and an investment vehicle managed by Banco BTG Pactual S.A. (“BTG Pactual”), will subscribe approximately R$ 2.0 billion (Euro 0.7 billion) of the cash capital increase

*  Based on 2012 reported full year financials for PT and Oi, CorpCo had proforma Revenues of R$ 37.5 billion (Euro 12.4 billion), EBITDA of R$ 12.8 billion (Euro 4.2 billion) and Operating Cash Flow of R$ 4.2 billion (Euro1.4 billion). Proforma for the targeted R$ 8.0 billion (Euro 2.7 billion) cash capital increase CorpCo net debt was R$ 41.2 billion (Euro 13.7 billion), as of 30 June 2013

*  CorpCo will benefit from enhanced scale and a leading position in Portugal and in Brazil. The enhancement of operating and financial efficiencies are expected to generate synergies with a net present value of approximately R$ 5.5 billion (Euro 1.8 billion)

*  The proposed exchange terms, based on the 30 days prior to announcement volume-weighted average price (“VWAP”) of the PT and Oi shares, are as follows:

*  1 Oi ON share will be exchanged into 1 CorpCo share

*  1 Oi PN share will be exchanged into 0.9211 CorpCo shares

*  1 PT share will be exchanged into the equivalent of Euro 2.2911 of CorpCo shares (to be issued at the price of Oi’s capital increase) plus 0.6330 CorpCo shares

*  At completion, and assuming the targeted cash capital increase of R$ 8 billion (Euro 2.7 billion) at Oi’s last 30 calendar days VWAP (R$ 4.36 or Euro 1.45 per share), the PT shareholders will own 38.1% of the voting and outstanding capital of CorpCo

*  Upon completion, CorpCo will be listed on the Novo Mercado segment of BM&FBOVESPA, on the NYSE Euronext and on the NYSE and will enjoy higher liquidity and a diversified shareholder base. The listing requirements of these stock exchanges will also underpin the highest standard of corporate governance

*  The merger will be conditional to, inter alia, approvals by the shareholders of Oi and PT, the successful completion of the capital increase, the successful completion of the liability management of the PT and Tpart debt, as well as approvals by relevant regulatory authorities

*  Closing of the proposed transaction is anticipated in H1 2014

*  Avistar, SGPS, S.A. (“BES”) and Nivalis Holding B.V. (“Ongoing”), the two largest shareholders of PT, have provided their support for the transaction and have jointly signed the MOU.

PT announced today that it has entered into a memorandum of understanding with Oi, AG Tel, Bratel Brasil S.A. (“Bratel”), Pasa Participações S.A. (“Pasa”), LF Tel, EDSP 75 Participações S.A. (“EDSP75”) (which together with Tpart are defined as “Oi Holding Companies”), BES and Ongoing setting out the basis for a proposed merger (the “Business Combination”) between the PT and Oi groups and the Oi Holding Companies to be combined into a single entity, Tpart or a new company to be created for this purpose (in either case, “CorpCo”).

Creation of a leading telecoms operator

The merger is the natural fulfilment of the industrial alliance established in 2010 between PT and Oi. The combination of PT and Oi will create a leading telecoms operator with operations covering a population of c. 260 million people and c. 100 million subscribers. The merger will consolidate the position of both companies as the leading operator for Portuguese-speaking countries with leadership positions in all markets where it operates. The combined company will aim to achieve significant economies of scale, maximise operational synergies and add value for its shareholders, customers and employees.

CorpCo will operate in strategic markets and benefit from compelling growth prospects in Brazil and mature operations in Portugal geared for economic recovery.

The Business Combination will enhance the implementation of strategic initiatives already underway, where PT and Oi have been sharing expertise and know-how in areas such as product development, customer care, engineering, operations and IT.

Commitment to highest corporate governance standards

As part of the merger, CorpCo intends to be listed on the Novo Mercado segment of BM&FBovespa, on the NYSE Euronext and on the NYSE, and implement best-in-class corporate governance with one class of shares with equal voting and dividend rights for all shareholders.

The Board of Directors for the first three-year term of office will be composed by the following members: Alexandre Jereissati Legey, Amilcar Morais Pires, Fernando Magalhães Portella, Fernando Marques dos Santos, Henrique Manuel Fusco Granadeiro, José Maria Ricciardi, José Mauro Mettrau Carneiro da Cunha, Nuno Rocha dos Santos de Almeida e Vasconcellos, Rafael Luís Mora Funes, Renato Torres de Faria e Sergio Franklin Quintella. José Mauro Mettrau Carneiro da Cunha and Henrique Manuel Fusco Granadeiro will be Chairman and Vice-Chairman of the Board of Directors, respectively.

Unified management team led by Zeinal Bava

Zeinal Bava, CEO of Portugal Telecom from 2008 to 2013 and the current CEO of Oi and PT Portugal, will be the CEO of CorpCo and its subsidiaries.

Improved time to market to crystalise growth opportunities in Brazil

The proposed merger will allow CorpCo to leverage Oi’s unique footprint in Brazil and PT’s experience in the Portuguese market, thus allowing it to crystalise the growth opportunities in convergence and mobility in Brazil.

Commitment to financial discipline and value creation

The combined entity will focus on achieving operational excellence. A clear action plan has been prepared aiming at integrating areas yielding incremental efficiencies, including the appointment of teams to monetise synergies and address existing operational challenges.

The Business Combination is expected to generate synergies estimated to have a NPV of R$ 5.5 billion (Euro 1.8 billion).

CorpCo is committed to strengthen further its financial discipline to improve the cash-flow profile to underpin investment in future growth areas and balance sheet flexibility.

Capital increase at Oi

Oi proposes to undertake a capital increase to be subscribed in cash and in kind (the “Oi Capital Increase”).

Oi targets to raise R$ 8.0 billion (Euro 2.7 billion), with a minimum of R$ 7.0 billion (Euro 2.3 billion), in cash (the “Cash Capital Increase”), to improve the balance sheet flexibility of CorpCo.

Shareholders of Tpart and an investment vehicle managed by BTG Pactual will subscribe approximately R$ 2.0 billion (Euro 0.7 billion) of the Cash Capital Increase.

In addition and subject to the Cash Capital Increase, PT will subscribe to a capital increase in kind of approximately R$ 6.1 billion (Euro 2.0 billion) (“Capital Increase in Kind”) fully subscribed through with the contribution of the PT Assets (as defined below).

The Oi Capital Increase of R$ 14.1 billion (Euro 4.7 billion) will be executed through the public issuance of common shares and preferred shares of Oi, in proportion to the current ratio between the common and preferred shares of Oi issued and outstanding.

The “PT Assets” shall be composed of all the shares directly or indirectly held by PT in companies that hold (i) all of its operating assets, excluding those directly or indirectly held in Oi and Contax Participações S.A. (“Contax”), and (ii) the respective liabilities as of the date of contribution. The PT Assets will be subject to a valuation by an independent appraiser, whose report shall be submitted to Oi’s Shareholders General Meeting. PT’s participation in the capital increase will also be subject to approval by PT’s Shareholders General Meeting.

Without prejudice to the valuation report of the PT Assets referred to above, PT estimated the equity value of PT Assets to be Euro 2.0 billion (equivalent to R$ 6.1 billion), within a range of a minimum of Euro 1.9 billion and a maximum of Euro 2.1 billion, equivalent to R$ 5.8 billion and R$ 6.4 billion, respectively, based on the exchange rate of Euro to Brazilian real of 3.0181. PT may elect not to consummate the subscription of shares in Oi Capital Increase in the event that the valuation report referred to above concludes that the value in Euro ascribed to the PT Assets is less than the estimated amounts indicated above, based on the exchange rate of Euro to Brazilian Real on the business day immediately prior of the issuance of the report.

The Oi Capital Increase is conditional to the full subscription of a minimum of R$ 7.0 billion (Euro 2.3 billion) of the Cash Capital Increase. The other conditions of the Oi Capital Increase will be set forth in the definitive agreements that will govern the Business Combination and will be disclosed at the appropriate time to our shareholders and the market in general.

At completion, post the incorporation of Oi shares into CorpCo, and assuming the targeted cash capital increase of R$ 8 billion (Euro 2.7 billion) at Oi’s last 30 calendar days VWAP (R$ 4.36 or Euro 1.45 per share), the PT shareholders will own 38.1% of the voting and outstanding capital of CorpCo.

PT may elect not to subscribe the Oi Capital Increase if the percentage participation of the PT shareholders in CorpCo after the Oi Capital Increase is equal to or less than 36.6% of the total capital of CorpCo on a fully diluted basis pro forma to the incorporation of Oi shares by CorpCo. Additionally, Tpart will not be obligated to consummate the Business Combination if the percentage participation of the PT shareholders in CorpCo after the Oi Capital Increase is greater than 39.6% of total capital of the CorpCo on a fully diluted basis pro forma to the incorporation of Oi shares by CorpCo.

Business Combination Steps

All steps prior to the final merger of PT into CorpCo are inter-conditional. The steps described below are illustrative, and a comprehensive description of all corporate actions to be undertaken will be disclosed at the appropriate time and will be included in the documentation to be submitted to the approval by shareholders.

a. Oi Capital Increase of R$ 14.1 billion (Euro 4.7 billion), structured as a public offering of common shares and preferred shares of Oi, of which a target of R$ 8.0 billion (Euro 2.7 billion) is expected to be subscribed in cash and approximately R$ 6.1 billion (Euro 2.0 billion) is expected to be subscribed by PT in kind, at the same price per share, through the contribution of the PT Assets;

b. Subscription by PT of convertible debentures (convertible into AG Tel and LF Tel shares) and exchangeable debentures convertible into the PN OI shares held by AG Tel and LF Tel, both to be issued by AG Tel and LF

Tel, followed by the subscription by AG Tel and LF Tel of convertible debentures (convertible into Tpart shares) to be issued by Tpart providing funds equivalent to the outstanding net debt of such entities, amounting to R$ 4.5 billion (Euro 1.5 billion);

c. Exchange of PT’s shares in CTX and Contax for shares of AG Tel and LF Tel, which at that time will have only Oi and Tpart shares;

d. Merger of PASA into AG Tel, EDSP75 into LF Tel, and the subsequent merger of AG Tel, LF Tel and Bratel into Tpart. Following this step, Tpart will only own Oi shares and will be free of debt or will have cash or cash equivalents to repay its debts;

e. Listing of CorpCo shares on the Novo Mercado segment of the BM&FBOVESPA and the incorporation of Oi shares into CorpCo, so that Oi becomes a fully owned subsidiary of CorpCo, upon which the existing shareholder agreements would terminate. Each Oi common share will receive 1 new common share of CorpCo, and each Oi preferred share will receive 0.9211 new common shares of CorpCo. The exchange ratios have been determined based on the VWAP of Oi common and preferred shares over the period of the last 30 calendar days;

f. Merger of PT into CorpCo, with CorpCo to be the surviving company.  At the time of its merger into CorpCo PT will be free of liabilities and will have no material assets other than the CorpCo shares;

g. As a result of the above mentioned steps PT shareholders will receive a number of CorpCo shares equivalent to the number of CorpCo shares then held by PT.

Based on the estimated value for the PT Assets as mentioned above, it is anticipated that in exchange for each PT share, shareholders will receive the equivalent of Euro 2.2911 in CorpCo shares (to be issued at the price of Oi’s share capital increase) plus 0.6330 shares in CorpCo.

Upon completion, CorpCo shares will be listed on the Novo Mercado segment of BM&FBOVESPA, on the NYSE Euronext and on the NYSE.

Conditions to closing

The consummation of the Business Combination will be subject to the following conditions:

a. Agreement by the parties regarding the terms and conditions of the definitive agreements relating to the Business Combination;

b. Approval of the transaction by the shareholders and corporate bodies of Oi, PT and all signatories of the MOU, as applicable;

c. Obtaining the applicable legal and administrative approvals in Brazil, Portugal and other applicable jurisdictions, such as Brazilian (CADE) and Portuguese Antitrust Authorities, telecom regulators ANATEL (Brazil) and ANACOM (Portugal), and securities and exchange commissions: CVM (Brazil), CMVM (Portugal) and the SEC (United States), as applicable;

d. Obtaining necessary waivers and consents from the lenders of PT and its holding companies, of Oi and its subsidiaries, and of Tpart and third parties to effect the Business Combination and to prevent violations or breaches of contracts as a result of the Business Combination in the form to be agreed in the definitive agreements;

e. The final and valid consummation of the Oi Capital Increase, without prejudice to the consummation of later steps in the Business Combination, as will be provided in the definitive agreements relating to the Business Combination.



The MOU expires on 1 October 2014 and may be extended by the parties


Serious News for Serious Traders!  Try StreetInsider.com Premium Free!

You May Also Be Interested In

Global Payments (GPN) to Acquire ACTIVE Network in $1.2B Deal; Announces Strategic Partnership with Vista Equity
Westmoreland Coal (WLB) Agrees to Sell ROVA for $5M
Veritex Holdings (VBTX) Commences Common Stock Offering


























Create E-mail Alert
	Related Categories
	
Hot Corp. News, Hot M&A, Management Comments, Mergers and Acquisitions 

Related Entities
Dividend, Definitive Agreement 




Login with Facebook


Add Your Comment

Name


Subject

Body


Share on Facebook



Verification

can't see the text? click here to refresh the image.
what's this?




Sign up for StreetInsider Free!
Receive full access to all new and archived articles, unlimited portfolio tracking, e-mail alerts, custom newswires and RSS feeds - and more!









 























 Free News FeedGet our RSS Feed!


© Copyright 2017 StreetInsider.com



Home
Member's Home
Premium Content


Links
Entities
About StreetInsider
Get Our Content


Advertise with Us
Contact Us
Disclaimer
Privacy Policy






















Oi announces material fact of step-up in basis of assets arising from Brasil Telecom S.A.'s acquisition of control of Telemar Norte Leste S.A.































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology












Powered by



        Oi announces material fact of step-up in basis of assets arising from Brasil Telecom S.A.'s acquisition of control of Telemar Norte Leste S.A.    























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink



 

          Apr 26, 2013           - PR Newswire      

          Mergers and Acquisitions      




Oi S.A. ("Oi") and Telemar Participacoes S.A. ("Telemar Participacoes"), in compliance with article 157, paragraph 4, of Law No. 6,404/76 and pursuant to CVM Instruction No. 358/02, inform their shareholders and the market in general that, in response to the formal consultation that Oi submitted to the Brazilian Securities and Exchange Commission (Comissao de Valores Mobiliarios - CVM) ("CVM") to confirm the most appropriate accounting treatment for the step-up in basis of assets arising from Br 




Sign up for unrestricted access to 200+ subscription services. 









                                    By signing up, you agree to our Terms of Use, Privacy Policy,  and the LexisNexis Terms & Conditions.
                                




                        Already have an account?  Click here to login.


RelSci News & Alerts gets you:

10 free articles a month from top subscription outlets like the Financial Times, New York Times, and Washington Post
Competitive business intelligence through daily data updates
Custom feeds on target high-value individuals, companies, industries, and topics delivered straight to your inbox







Related News Feeds






Board and Executive Moves involving Telemar Norte Leste SA







Alumni of Telemar Norte Leste SA







Board and Executive Moves involving Telemar Participações SA







Alumni of Telemar Participações SA




Create your own custom news feed 




Mentioned Entities




                          Telemar Norte Leste SA                      



                          Telemar Participações SA                      



                          Brazilian Securities & Exchange Commission                      



                          Oi SA                      



                          Pedro Jereissati                      



                          Alex Waldemar Zornig                      



See how you can reach these people and organizations 










You've found a premium RelSci Pro feature!



Connect to Individuals and Organizations In This Story

Upgrade to RelSci Pro to easily sync your contacts and see how you can reach the people and organizations featured in this article.


Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.



Not Now










Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤


































Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA - Research and Markets

















































































ABOUT US
BLOG
CONTACT US
FAQ























USD
EUR
GBP



USD 
▼

USD
EUR
GBP






€
EUR
$
USD
£
GBP







+353-1-416-8900REST OF WORLD



1-800-526-8630U.S. (TOLL FREE)








 




Advanced








Price:
€75EUR$92USD£70GBP 
View Pricing






 Home
/






Categories
/






Company Reports











 
SELECT A FORMAT








€75EUR$92USD£70GBP



                                                        Single User
                                                         Electronic (PDF)






                                                                            
                                                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product. The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 

                                                







  ADD TO BASKET




                                                                        order by fax
                                        

                                            need a quote ?
                                        



 

OUR CLIENTS












HAVE A QUESTION?
EMAIL US
VIEW FAQs



RECENTLY VIEWED PRODUCTS











Partner of Research and MarketsVACCINATING 40,000 CHILDREN IN 2017





WHY CHOOSE RESEARCH AND MARKETS?



WORLD'S LARGEST SELECTION




TRUSTED BY THE BEST




CUSTOMER FOCUSED




SAFE & SECURE







Research and Markets Orders Department was very responsive and helpful. Thank you for making this a great

                         purchase experience.
                        
                    



                            READ MORE
                        


Ms Keiko Tokuda
Marketing Manager
Eventbrite















Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA



ID: 648581
Company Profile
July 2017
Region: Venezuela
66 Pages

Wright Investors Service                                











DESCRIPTION


TABLE OF CONTENTS


SAMPLES



                                                                COUNTRIES COVERED
                                                            


FORMATS







1 of 5








                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                A textual analysis of the financial results for Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact information, senior officers and Wright Quality Rating analyses is also provided.Quantitative analyses of financial statements (Income Statement, Balance Sheet and Sources of Capital), extensive ratio tables (Accounting, Asset Utilization, Employee Efficiency, Fixed Charges Coverage, Leverage Analysis, Liquidity Analysis, Per-share Data and Profitability Analysis) and proprietary Wright Quality Rating® analyses tables. The Wright Quality Rating measures the liquidity of the stock and the financial strength, profitability and corporate growth characteristics of Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA A textual review of the financial results of Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA versus OI SA, Telefonica Brasil SA and Telecom Argentina SA is includedrepo.   The comparative analysis,of these companies,compares Sales, Company Valuations and Financial Position. Also included for Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA are: Company Description, Recent Stock Performance, Profitability Analysis, Dividend Analysis, and key data items. Additional research for Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA includes tables with up to 10-years of history of computed ratios, sales, earnings, and security prices. The company’s financial results are compared in a series of reports (i.e. financial statements, sales, key ratios, etc.) to global industry averages.
                                                                            

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




2 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                    Company FundamentalsCompany ProfileComparative Business AnalysisSummary Analysis per ShareSales AnalysisPrice AnalysisEarnings and Dividends AnalysisFinancial Statement AnalysesBalance Sheet - Common SizeBalance Sheet - Year-Year Percent ChangeBalance Sheet - Five-Year AveragesIncome Statement - Common SizeIncome Statement - Year-Year Percent ChangeIncome Statement - Five-Year AveragesSources of CapitalFinancial Ratio AnalysesAccounting RatiosAsset UtilizationEmployee EfficiencyFixed Charges CoverageLeverage AnalysisLiquidity AnalysisPer-Share DataProfitability AnalysisWright Quality Rating AnalysesInvestment AcceptanceFinancial StrengthProfitability and StabilityCorporate Growth

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




3 of 5





LOADING...







4 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                    Venezuela
                                                                                
Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




5 of 5






Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown








RELATED PRODUCTS 







Compania Nacional De Telefonos Telefonica Del Sur SA


 Company Profile
70 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







TIM Participacoes SA


 Company Profile
69 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







OI SA


 Company Profile
70 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Embratel Participacoes SA


 Company Profile
56 Pages
January 2015






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Telecom Argentina SA


 Company Profile
69 Pages
June 2017
Region: Argentina






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Jereissati Participacoes SA


 Company Profile
69 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Telecomunicacoes Brasileiras S.A. - Telebras


 Company Profile
69 Pages
November 2016






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Maxcom Telecomunicaciones, S.A.B. De C.V.


 Company Profile
69 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Empresa Nacional De Telecomunicacione Sa


 Company Profile
70 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Banco Nacional De Credito Ca Banco Universal


 Company Profile
53 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP








 close

Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA



 close

ASK A QUESTION

*Required Information
 
Product: Nacional Telefonos de Venezuela CA


YOUR QUESTION*







YOUR CONTACT DETAILS*

Title
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name




Last Name




Email Address




Country
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




Phone Number



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998












We request your telephone number so we can contact you in the event we have difficulty reaching you via email.
                    We aim to respond to all questions on the same business day.





 



 close

SEND TO A FRIEND

* Required Information
 FRIEND'S DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*




Message to friend




YOUR CONTACT DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*













 


 close

Request a Quote

 
Please complete the below form and click "send request" to obtain a pdf quotation and order form.
This document will be available for immediate download and will also be emailed to you.
            
* Required Information


YOUR ADDRESS

Address 1*




Address 2




Address 3




City*




Postal/ZIP Code




Country*
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State





YOUR DETAILS

Title*
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name*




Last Name*




Organisation*




Email Address*




Phone Number*



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998











                                PO Number
                                (if applicable)







PRODUCT FORMAT




License
Format
Properties
Price




 
SINGLE USER Electronic (PDF)                                                



                                            The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 
                                        

                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product.
                                        

€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







* The price quoted above is only valid for 30 days. Please submit your order within that time frame to avail of this price as all prices are subject to change.





 






















